Rhode Island, session 2025, SB586.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-1.1 of the General Laws entitled "Division of Occupational
Health" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-1.1-18. Extreme temperatures employee protection.
(a) As used herein, the term “extreme temperatures” means temperatures at or above ninety
degrees Fahrenheit (90° F), or at or below thirty-two degrees Fahrenheit (32° F).
(b) Employers shall implement plans and conduct business activities to prevent and reduce
exposure of employees to extreme temperatures. These plans and activities shall include, but not
be limited to, the following:
(1) Employees shall have access to paid rest breaks, adequate shade, warming or cooling
stations, drinking water, personal protective equipment, and other protections from extreme
temperatures in regard to heat and cold.
(2) Pursuant to a program established in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c)
of this section, employers shall require supervisors and managers to:
(i) Complete the department of health’s online public tutorial program quarterly to
recognize the signs of overexposure to hot and cold temperatures, such as injuries and illnesses
caused by extreme temperatures, and ensure that appropriate personal protective equipment is
available such as hats, gloves, winter coats, cooling vests, and sunscreen as appropriate for the
extreme temperatures; and
(ii) Ensure that heating and cooling equipment is maintained and functional.

(3) Further protections shall be established for employees who work in vehicles.
Employees who spend more than sixty (60) minutes in vehicles, or whose workplace is considered
a vehicle, shall have adequate insulation and heating/cooling equipment within the vehicle to
protect the occupants from extreme heat or cold.
(4) Further protections shall be established for employees who work in a warehouse.
Employees who spend more than sixty (60) minutes in a warehouse, or whose workplace is
considered a warehouse, shall have adequate insulation and heating/cooling equipment within the
warehouse to protect the employees from extreme heat or cold.
(5) Further protections shall be established for employees who work outdoors, including,
but not limited to, construction sites, farms, vineyards, recreation, and fishing sites. Employees who
spend more than sixty (60) minutes outdoors, or whose workplace is considered outdoors, shall
have adequate heating and cooling equipment within the working space to protect the employees
from extreme heat or cold.
(6) Pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, free and effective training on temperature
safety shall be provided quarterly for employees who work in a warehouse, in vehicles, or outdoors,
including, but not limited to, construction sites, farms, vineyards, recreation, and fishing sites. This
training shall take place quarterly during work hours and include the following elements:
(i) Inform and assist employees to identify the risk factors, signs, and symptoms of cold
stress and heat related illnesses and the necessary medical responses;
(ii) Inform the employees of the paid rest breaks, adequate shade, warming or cooling
stations, drinking water, personal protective equipment, heating and cooling equipment, and other
protections which shall be provided;
(iii) Outline and clarify the employer's procedures for monitoring temperature conditions
and provide workers with the ability to participate in the monitoring process; and
(iv) Demonstrate the proper use of personal protective equipment, such as hats, gloves,
winter coats, cooling vests, sunscreen, and related protective equipment.
(c) The department of health shall create and implement an online public tutorial program
for supervisors and managers to recognize the signs of overexposure to hot and cold temperatures,
such as injuries and illnesses caused by extreme temperatures, and ensure that appropriate personal
protective equipment is available, including hats, gloves, winter coats, cooling vests, and sunscreen,
as appropriate for the extreme temperatures.
(d) For any employer to discharge employees or discriminate against them resulting from
the failure of an employer to implement or perform any of the duties required by this section shall
be an unlawful employment practice in addition to the provisions of § 28-5-7.
LC001587 - Page 2 of 4

(e) The department of health may promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to
implement and administer this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001587
========
LC001587 - Page 3 of 4